Utah statutes.
32B-15-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Death of a third person" includes recovery for all damages, special and general, resulting from the death, except punitive damages.

(2) (a)  "Injury" includes injury in person, property, or means of support.

(b)  "Injury" also includes recovery for intangibles such as:

(i)  mental and emotional injuries;

(ii)  loss of affection; and

(iii)  loss of companionship.

